Delaware, session 153, HB479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part X, Title 7 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Chapter 101. Community Heat Protection and Industrial Accountability Act. Â§10101. Short title. This chapter is known and may be cited as the âCommunity Heat Protection and Industrial Accountability Act.â Â§10102. Purpose. (a) The General Assembly finds all of the following: (1) Elevated ambient temperatures increase the bodyâs thermal load, impairing its ability to regulate core temperature, particularly in high humidity conditions. (2) A temperature increase of even 2 degrees Fahrenheit during extreme heat events can: a. Increase the incidence of heat exhaustion and heat stroke. b. Elevate cardiovascular stress, leading to higher rates of heart attacks and strokes. c. Worsen air quality by accelerating ozone formation. d. Increase nighttime temperatures, reducing physiological recovery and compounding health risks. (3) Studies have demonstrated that incremental temperature increases during heat waves correlate with measurable increases in mortality rates, especially in urban and heat-vulnerable communities. (4) Preventing anthropogenic (human-caused) heat contributions during critical periods is a cost-effective and immediate method of reducing heat-related health risks. (b) Based on the findings under subsection (a) of this section, the purpose of this chapter is to safeguard public health by requiring the temporary cessation, or mitigation, of commercial activities that materially elevate nearby residential temperatures during periods of extreme heat. Â§10103. Definitions. For purposes of this chapter: (1) âCommercial operationâ means any non-residential facility engaged in industrial, manufacturing, data processing, energy generation, or other large-scale activities that emit waste heat into the surrounding environment. (2) âDepartmentâ means the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control (DNREC). (3) âHeat advisoryâ and âextreme heat warningâ mean official designations issued by the National Weather Service or an equivalent authority. (4) âMitigation measuresâ include technological or operational changes that reduce heat emissions to below the thermal impact threshold. (5) âResidential communityâ means an area primarily zoned for housing or containing a significant population of permanent residents. (6) âThermal impact thresholdâ means a measured or modeled increase of greater than 2.0 degrees Fahrenheit in ambient outdoor temperature within a residential community attributable to a specific commercial operation. Â§10104. Applicability. (a) This chapter applies to any commercial operation determined by the Department to have a measurable thermal impact on a residential community. (b) The Department must establish standardized methodologies for measuring and modeling thermal impacts, which may include: (1) Temperature monitoring. (2) Remote sensing. (3) Atmospheric dispersion and heat transfer modeling. Â§10105. Operational restrictions during heat events. (a) Any commercial operation determined to exceed the thermal impact threshold must cease operations until implementation of sufficient mitigation measures to reduce the thermal impact below the threshold during any period in which a heat advisory or extreme heat warning is in effect for the affected area. (b) Operational suspension must remain in effect for the duration of the advisory or warning unless compliance is demonstrated. Â§10106. Monitoring, reporting, and compliance. (a) Covered commercial operations must do all of the following: (1) Conduct regular thermal impact assessments. (2) Maintain records of waste heat emissions and mitigation efforts. (3) Report data to the Department upon request. (b) The Department must: (1) Establish a public reporting system for community complaints and temperature data. (2) Publish guidance for compliance. Â§10107. Enforcement and penalties. (a) A commercial operation found in violation of this chapter is subject to one or more of the following: (1) A civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 per day of violation. (2) A mandatory shutdown order. (3) An additional penalty for repeated or wilful noncompliance. (b) A private cause of action is available to any victim of a violation of this chapter for any remedy available under State law, including compensatory and punitive damages and injunctive relief. Â§10108. Exemptions. Facilities, not including data centers, that are zoned for heavy industrial use are exempt from the requirements of this chapter. Section 2. The Secretary of the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control must promulgate regulations necessary to implement this chapter within 18 months of [the enactment date of this Act], including: (1) Technical standards for thermal measurement. (2) Procedures for emergency compliance. Section 3. This Act is severable. If any provision of this Act, or the application of this Act to a person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder must not be affected. Section 4. This Act must be implemented the earlier of the following: (1) Six months after notice by the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control in the Register of Regulations that regulations implementing this Act have been promulgated. (2) Twenty-four months after enactment.